South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 14, Article XVII of the Constitution of this State be amended to read: Section 14. Every citizen who is eighteen years of age or older, not laboring under disabilities prescribed in this Constitution or otherwise established by law, shall be deemed sui juris and endowed with full legal rights and responsibilities, provided, that the General Assembly may restrict the sale of alcoholic beverages, or other products, substances, or services determined by the General Assembly to be unreasonably hazardous, perilous, or unsafe to persons until age twenty-one. SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 14, Article XVII of the Constitution of this State, relating to citizens deemed sui juris and restrictions regarding the sale of alcoholic beverages, be amended so as to allow the General Assembly to restrict the sale of products, substances, or services determined by the General Assembly to be unreasonably hazardous, perilous, or unsafe to persons until age twenty-one? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes,' and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----